Hawaii statutes.
§181-9 Penalty; injunction. Any person
violating section 181-3(a) shall forfeit to the State not more than $5,000 for
every violation, to be recovered by action brought in the name of the State by
the board of land and natural resources. Any person violating section 181-3(a)
or this chapter or any permit issued pursuant thereto may be enjoined by the
circuit environmental court from continuing the violation. The penalty and
remedy provided by this section shall be in addition to any criminal or civil penalty
provided by any other law. [L 1957, c 161, §10; am L 1959, c 20, §7; am L Sp
1959 2d, c 1, §21; am L 1961, c 132, §2; Supp, §98C-10; HRS §181-9; am L 2014,
c 218, §8]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next